Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 9 Community Obligations and Banking Offenses
19-9-16.
Replacement of lost or destroyed passbook.

When any person to whom a passbook, share certificate, membership certificate, stock certificate, deposit certificate, or other form of investment contract has been issued by any regulated institution, or by any insured-deposit-taking institution organized under the laws of the United States, states in writing, under oath, to the regulated institution or insured-deposit-taking institution organized under the laws of the United States that issued the book, certificate, or other form of investment contract, that the book, certificate, or other form of investment contract has not been hypothecated, but has been lost or destroyed, and shall make written application for the issue of a duplicate book, certificate, or other form of investment contract, then the regulated institution or insured-deposit-taking institution organized under the laws of the United States may issue a duplicate book, certificate, or other form of investment contract, and upon delivery, the regulated institution or insured-deposit-taking institution organized under the laws of the United States shall be discharged from all liability on account of the issue of the original book, certificate, or other form of investment contract. References in this section to an issuing regulated institution or insured-deposit-taking institution organized under the laws of the United States shall be taken to include any successor regulated institution or insured-deposit-taking institution organized under the laws of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 8.

19-9-17.
Charge-free savings accounts for minors.

Every regulated institution shall provide for charge-free savings accounts to persons aged seventeen (17) years or less; provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to those accounts having a balance of five hundred dollars ($500) or more.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-18.
Depositor identification.

All regulated institutions shall, unless they have reason to doubt the validity of the identification, accept as sufficient identification for the cashing of checks and other banking transactions involving municipal, state, or federal funds in amounts less than seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750), duly authorized Rhode Island identification cards issued pursuant to the provision of §

3-8-6(b)

, the picture identification card issued by the division of elderly affairs, or an operator’s or chauffeur’s license issued pursuant to chapter 10 of title 31.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-19.
Checks on consumer deposit accounts to show date account was opened.

All checks, drafts, or similar negotiable or non-negotiable instruments or orders of withdrawal that are drawn against funds held by a regulated institution, as defined in this title, shall clearly display on the face the month and year in which the account was opened. This section does not apply to temporary checks, drafts, similar negotiable or non-negotiable instruments, or orders of withdrawal.

For the purposes of this section, the term “consumer deposit account” means a demand or other similar deposit account established and maintained by a natural person with a regulated institution and operated primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

No liability or penalty shall be imposed on any depositor, regulated institution, or printer for an unintentional failure to comply with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-20.
Withdrawal from time deposit accounts.

Except as required by federal law, no regulated institution or other insured-deposit-taking institutions organized under the laws of the United States shall assess any penalty for early withdrawal from any time deposit account if the owner of the account has died or been declared mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-21.
Passbook savings accounts — Service charge prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any regulated institution or other insured-deposit-taking institution duly organized under the laws of the United States, to charge any service charge whatsoever for the holding of passbook savings deposits or accounts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-21.1.
Fee disclosure by banks, credit unions and other financial institutions.

Any bank, credit union, or other financial institution doing business in this state shall display a notice that enumerates that there may be charges imposed by the institution of which the customer may not be aware.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 338, § 1.

19-9-22.
Violations by officers and employees.

Every president, director, officer, trustee, cashier, treasurer, teller, clerk, employee, or agent of any licensee licensed pursuant to chapter 14 of title 19, regulated institution, or other depository, who, without authority of the directors or trustees, issues or puts forth any certificate of deposit, draws any order or bill of exchange, makes any acceptance, assigns any note, bond, draft, bill of exchange, mortgage, judgment, or decree, or who makes any false entry in any book, report, or statement of the licensee, regulated institution, or other depository with intent in either case to injure or defraud the licensee, regulated institution, or other depository, or any company, corporation, or person, or to deceive any officer of the licensee, regulated institution, or other depository, the director of business regulation, or any agent appointed by the director to examine the affairs of that licensee, regulated institution, or other depository; and any person who with like intent aids or abets any officer, clerk, or agent in violation of this section, upon conviction, shall be fined not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 2000, ch. 236, § 1.

19-9-23.
Theft, embezzlement or misapplication by regulated institution, lending, credit and insurance officer or employee.

Every president, director, officer, trustee, cashier, treasurer, teller, clerk, or agent of any regulated institution, insurance company, or other depository who embezzles, abstracts, purloins, or willfully misapplies any of the moneys, funds, or credits entrusted to the custody or care of the regulated institution, insurance company, or other depository, and any person who, with like intent, aids or abets any officer, clerk, or agent in violation of this section, upon conviction, shall be fined not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-24.
Fraudulent checks — Small amounts.

Any person who purchases any goods, materials, or services, makes payment for that purchase by check, draft, or order for payment of money, and takes possession of the goods or materials, or has the benefit of the service, and who subsequently orders payment stopped on the check, draft, or order for payment, or who, with intent to defraud, makes, draws, utters, or delivers any check, draft, or order for the payment of money, in an amount not exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), upon any regulated institution or other depository, knowing at the time of making, drawing, uttering, or delivering that the maker or drawer has not sufficient funds in, or credit with, that regulated institution or other depository for the payment of that check, draft, or order, in full, upon its presentation, shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned not exceeding one year, or may be subjected to both fine and imprisonment.

With regard to the purchase of any goods or materials, it shall not be in violation of this section if goods or materials are returned to the vendor within three (3) business days of the filing of the stop payment order.

The word “credit” means an arrangement or understanding with the regulated institution or other depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order.

Any person violating any of these provisions may be prosecuted and proceeded against in any judicial district or in any county in which the offense was committed, or in which the check, draft, or order was uttered or delivered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 2012, ch. 137, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 176, § 2.

19-9-25.
Fraudulent checks — Large amounts.

Any person who purchases any goods, materials, or services, pays for that purchase by check, draft, or order for payment of money, and takes possession of the item, and who subsequently orders payment stopped on the check, draft, or order for payment, or who, with intent to defraud, makes, draws, utters, or delivers any check, draft, or order for the payment of money, in an amount exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), upon any regulated institution or other depository, knowing at the time of making, drawing, uttering, or delivering that the maker or drawer has not sufficient funds in, or credit with, that regulated institution or other depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order, in full, upon its presentation, shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or be imprisoned not more than two (2) years, or may be subjected to both fine and imprisonment.

With regard to the purchase of any goods or materials, it shall not be in violation of this section if goods or materials are returned to the vendor within three (3) business days of the filing of the stop payment order.

The word “credit” means an arrangement or understanding with the regulated institution or other depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order.

Any person violating any of these provisions may be prosecuted and proceeded against in any judicial district or in any county in which the offense was committed, or in which the check, draft, or order was uttered or delivered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 2012, ch. 137, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 176, § 2.

19-9-26.
Prima facie evidence of intent to defraud — Prosecutions.

The following shall be prima facie evidence of intent to defraud within the meaning of §§

19-9-24

and

19-9-25

as against the maker or drawer: the making, drawing, uttering, or delivering of a check, draft, or order for the payment of money upon any regulated institution or other depository, payment of which is refused by the drawee for the reason that the maker or drawer has not sufficient funds in, or credit with, the regulated institution or other depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order in full upon its presentation, or for the reason that the maker or drawer has stopped payment on a check, draft, or order for the payment of money for the purchase of any goods, materials or service; provided, however, that these shall not be prima facie evidence of intent to defraud if the maker or drawer shall pay the check, draft, or order, or deposit and leave with the drawee for its payment the amount due thereon within seven (7) days after the receipt of written notice from the payee by certified mail, return receipt requested, at the last address of the maker or drawer which is available in the records of the payee.

If the check, draft, or order has not been paid within seven (7) business days after the maker or drawer receives written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, or if there is a return of the notice undelivered and the payee presents an affidavit containing facts within the payee’s own knowledge that the maker or drawer was not residing at the last address available in the records of the payee, the payee shall forthwith notify the prosecuting officer of the city or town where the check, draft, or order was written of that fact and the prosecuting officer shall prosecute all violations of §§

19-9-24

,

19-9-25

, and

19-9-26

within ten (10) business days of the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-27.
Check kiting.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

19-9-24

or §

19-9-25

, any person, natural or otherwise, who shall utilize any scheme, device, or artifice, commonly known as a check kite or check kiting, for the purposes of defrauding any regulated institution or other depository, any vendor of goods, materials, or services, or for the purpose of deception of any investor, potential investor, or purchaser as to the financial condition or status of that person, in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned not exceeding one year, or both.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

19-9-24

or §

19-9-25

, any person, natural or otherwise, who shall utilize any scheme, device, or artifice, commonly known as a check kite or check kiting, for the purposes of defrauding any regulated institution or other depository or any vendor of goods, materials, or services, or for the purposes of deception of any investor, potential investor, or purchaser as to the financial condition or status of that person, in an amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), shall be fined not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years, or both.

For the purposes of this section, a “check kite” or “check kiting” means the practice of taking advantage of the time that elapses between the deposit or negotiation of a check, draft, or other negotiable instrument in one regulated institution or other depository and its collection or presentment in another regulated institution or other depository with the intent to defraud.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-28.
False statement to obtain loan.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement to any regulated institution, licensee or other depository respecting the financial condition of any person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of obtaining a loan from that regulated institution, licensee, or other depository, whether for that person’s own use or for the use of any other person, firm, or corporation, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than six (6) months nor more than five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-29.
Bank fraud.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement to any regulated institution or other depository, or who knowingly executes, or attempts to execute, a scheme or artifice to defraud, or willingly overvalues any land, property, or security, for the purpose of influencing in any way the action of that regulated institution or other depository, whether for that person’s own use or for the use of any other person, firm, or corporation, in violation of this section, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or be imprisoned not exceeding fifteen (15) years, or both. For the purposes of this section, the term “scheme or artifice to defraud” includes a scheme or artifice to deprive another of the intangible right of honest services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-30.
Injunctions against fraud.

The attorney general is hereby empowered to bring an action in the name of the state in any court of competent jurisdiction for restraining orders and injunctive relief to restrain and enjoin violations or threatened violation of the provisions of §§

19-9-23

and

19-9-29

.

If any person, firm, corporation, or other legal entity is alienating or disposing of property, or intends to alienate or dispose of property obtained as a result of a violation of §§

19-9-23

and/or

19-9-29

, or property that is traceable to this violation, the attorney general may commence a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To enjoin the alienation or disposition of property; or

For a restraining order to:

Prohibit any person from withdrawing, transferring, removing, dissipating, or disposing of any of the property or property of equivalent value; and

Appoint a temporary receiver to administer the restraining order.

A permanent or temporary injunction or restraining order shall be granted without bond. The court shall proceed as soon as practicable to the hearing and determination of an action and may, at any time before final determination, enter a restraining order or prohibition or take other action as is warranted to prevent a continuing and substantial injury to the state or to any person or class of persons for whose protection the action is brought.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-31.
False rumors as to condition of regulated institution.

Every person who willfully or maliciously instigates, makes, circulates, or transmits to another or others any statement, untrue in fact, derogatory to the financial condition or affecting the solvency or financial standing of any regulated institution or other insured-deposit-taking institution duly organized under the laws of the United States doing business in this state, or who counsels, aids, procures, or induces another to start, transmit, or circulate any statement or rumor, shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-32.
Disclosure of arson conviction.

Every financial institution making loans within this state secured by an interest in real estate may require applicants for loans to disclose whether or not the applicant or applicants have been convicted of any degree of the crime of arson as described in chapter 4 of title 11 within ten (10) years prior to the date of application.

A financial institution may use the existence of an arson conviction within ten (10) years of the application date as a reason to deny the application.

Failure to disclose the existence of an arson conviction when requested upon a mortgage application shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a sentence of not more than one year imprisonment.

The mortgage application form shall indicate the existence of a criminal penalty for failure to disclose a conviction for arson.

For the purpose of this section, the term “applicant” means a natural person, trust, partnership, association, corporation, or other form of business organization; provided, however, that if the applicant is a trust, the beneficiaries of the trust shall be included, and if the applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or other form of business organization, each member, director, shareholder owning more than twenty percent (20%) of the common stock issued by the corporation, and principal officer of the organization shall be included.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 244, § 1.

19-9-33.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-34.
Property insurance.

Every lending institution shall be subject to the provisions of §

27-5-3.2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 112, § 2.

19-9-35.
Consumer privacy in mortgage applications.

For purposes of this section, “mortgage trigger lead” means a consumer report obtained pursuant to section 604(c)(1)(B) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681b, where the issuance of the report is triggered by an inquiry made with a consumer reporting agency in response to an application for credit. “Mortgage trigger lead” does not include a consumer report obtained by a lender or servicer that holds or services existing indebtedness of the applicant who is the subject of the report.

With regard to a solicitation of a consumer for a residential mortgage loan, as defined in §

19-14.10-3

, which solicitation is based, in whole or in part, on information contained in a mortgage trigger lead, the following shall be deemed to be a prohibited act or practice for purposes of §§

19-4-12

,

19-14-26

and

19-14.10-17

:

The failure to clearly and conspicuously state in the initial phase of the solicitation that the solicitor is not affiliated with the lender or broker with which the consumer initially applied;

The failure to clearly and conspicuously state in the initial phase of the solicitation that the solicitation is based on personal information about the consumer that was purchased, directly or indirectly, from a consumer reporting agency without the knowledge or permission of the lender or broker with which the consumer initially applied;

The failure, in the initial solicitation, to comply with the provisions of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act relating to prescreening solicitations that use consumer reports, including the requirement to make a firm offer of credit to the consumer; or

Knowingly or negligently using information from a mortgage trigger lead:

To solicit consumers who have opted out of prescreened offers of credit under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; or

To place telephone calls to consumers who have placed their contact information on a federal or state “do-not-call” list.

In addition to any other remedy provided by law, any lender or broker aggrieved by a prohibited act or practice under this section may bring an action in the superior court in which venue the lender or broker has an office to enjoin an act in violation of this section and recover damages. The court shall award damages in the amount of actual damages or one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, whichever is greater. In any successful action for injunctive relief or for damages, the court shall award the lender or broker attorneys’ fees and costs, including court costs.

The director, or the director’s designee, may adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 202, § 1.